da: Bagakselstandard: Bolt-on 3/8 tommer (BMX); Fodbremse; Quick release; Quick release 9×135 mm; Thru-axle (generisk); Thru-axle 142×12 mm; Thru-axle 148×12 mm (Boost); Thru-axle 150×12 mm; Thru-axle 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Andet
sk-SK: Štandardná zadná oska: Skrutkovacia 3/8 in (BMX); Protišliapacia brzda; Rýchloupinák; Rýchloupinák 9×135 mm; Pevná os (generická); Pevná os 142×12 mm; Pevná os 148×12 mm (Boost); Pevná os 150×12 mm; Pevná os 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Iné
pt-PT: Norma do eixo traseiro: Aparafusado de 3/8 pol. (BMX); Travão de contrapedal; Aperto rápido; Aperto rápido de 9×135 mm; Eixo passante (genérico); Eixo passante de 142×12 mm; Eixo passante de 148×12 mm (Boost); Eixo passante de 150×12 mm; Eixo passante de 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Outro
sl-SI: Standard zadnje osi: Privijačeno 3/8 in (BMX); Torpedo zavora; Hitri zatezalec; Hitri zatezalec 9×135 mm; Prečna os (generična); Prečna os 142×12 mm; Prečna os 148×12 mm (Boost); Prečna os 150×12 mm; Prečna os 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Drugo
tr: Arka aks standardı: Cıvatalı 3/8 inç (BMX); Kontra fren; Quick release; Quick release 9×135 mm; Sokma mil (genel); Sokma mil 142×12 mm; Sokma mil 148×12 mm (Boost); Sokma mil 150×12 mm; Sokma mil 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Diğer
sv: Bakaxelstandard: Bolt-on 3/8 tum (BMX); Fotbroms; Snabbkoppling; Snabbkoppling 9×135 mm; Genomgående axel (generisk); Genomgående axel 142×12 mm; Genomgående axel 148×12 mm (Boost); Genomgående axel 150×12 mm; Genomgående axel 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Övrigt
cs: Standardní zadní náprava: Šroubovací 3/8 palce (BMX); Protišlapná brzda; Rychloupínák; Rychloupínák 9×135 mm; Pevná osa (univerzální); Pevná osa 142×12 mm; Pevná osa 148×12 mm (Boost); Pevná osa 150×12 mm; Pevná osa 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Ostatní
zh-CN: 后轮轴标准: 螺栓固定式 3/8 英寸 (BMX); 倒刹; 快拆; 快拆 9×135 mm; 桶轴（通用）; 桶轴 142×12 mm; 桶轴 148×12 mm (Boost); 桶轴 150×12 mm; 桶轴 157×12 mm (Super Boost); 其他
hu: Hátsó tengely szabványa: Csavaros 3/8 in (BMX); Kontrafék; Gyorszár; Gyorszár 9×135 mm; Átütőtengely (általános); Átütőtengely 142×12 mm; Átütőtengely 148×12 mm (Boost); Átütőtengely 150×12 mm; Átütőtengely 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Egyéb
fr: Standard d’axe arrière: Boulonné 3/8 po (BMX); Frein à rétropédalage; Attache rapide; Attache rapide 9×135 mm; Axe traversant (générique); Axe traversant 142×12 mm; Axe traversant 148×12 mm (Boost); Axe traversant 150×12 mm; Axe traversant 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Autre
hr-HR: Standardna stražnja osovina: Na vijke 3/8 in (BMX); Nožna kočnica; Brzo otpuštanje; Brzo otpuštanje 9 × 135 mm; Thru-axle (generički); Thru-axle 142 × 12 mm; Thru-axle 148 × 12 mm (Boost); Thru-axle 150 × 12 mm; Thru-axle 157 × 12 mm (Super Boost); Ostalo
vi: Trục sau tiêu chuẩn: Bắt bu-lông 3/8 in (BMX); Phanh đạp ngược; Tháo lắp nhanh; Tháo lắp nhanh 9×135 mm; Trục xuyên (thông dụng); Trục xuyên 142×12 mm; Trục xuyên 148×12 mm (Boost); Trục xuyên 150×12 mm; Trục xuyên 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Khác
de: Hinterachsstandard: Schraubachse 3/8 Zoll (BMX); Rücktrittbremse; Schnellspanner; Schnellspanner 9×135 mm; Steckachse (generisch); Steckachse 142×12 mm; Steckachse 148×12 mm (Boost); Steckachse 150×12 mm; Steckachse 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Sonstige
th: มาตรฐานเพลาล้อหลัง: ยึดด้วยน็อต 3/8 นิ้ว (BMX); โคสเตอร์เบรก; ปลดเร็ว; ปลดเร็ว 9×135 มม.; แกนสอด (ทั่วไป); แกนสอด 142×12 มม.; แกนสอด 148×12 มม. (Boost); แกนสอด 150×12 มม.; แกนสอด 157×12 มม. (Super Boost); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Traseiro eixo padrão: Parafusado 3/8 pol. (BMX); Freio contrapedal; Liberação rápida; Liberação rápida 9×135 mm; Eixo passante (genérico); Eixo passante 142×12 mm; Eixo passante 148×12 mm (Boost); Eixo passante 150×12 mm; Eixo passante 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Outro
ro-RO: Punte spate standard: Prindere cu șurub 3/8 inchi (BMX); Frână tip torpedou; Eliberare rapidă; Eliberare rapidă 9×135 mm; Ax traversant (generic); Ax traversant 142×12 mm; Ax traversant 148×12 mm (Boost); Ax traversant 150×12 mm; Ax traversant 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Altele
zh-TW: 後軸標準: 螺栓式 3/8 吋 (BMX); 腳煞車; 快拆式; 快拆式 9×135 mm; 貫通軸 (一般); 貫通軸 142×12 mm; 貫通軸 148×12 mm (Boost); 貫通軸 150×12 mm; 貫通軸 157×12 mm (Super Boost); 其他
ko: 후륜 액슬 표준: 볼트온 3/8인치(BMX); 코스터 브레이크; 퀵 릴리스; 퀵 릴리스 9×135 mm; 스루 액슬(일반); 스루 액슬 142×12 mm; 스루 액슬 148×12 mm(Boost); 스루 액슬 150×12 mm; 스루 액슬 157×12 mm(Super Boost); 기타
pl: Standard tylnej osi: Na śruby 3/8 cala (BMX); Hamulec typu torpedo; Szybkozamykacz; Szybkozamykacz 9×135 mm; Sztywna oś (ogólna); Sztywna oś 142×12 mm; Sztywna oś 148×12 mm (Boost); Sztywna oś 150×12 mm; Sztywna oś 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Inne
ru: Стандарт задней оси: На болтах 3/8 дюйма (BMX); Ножной тормоз; Эксцентрик; Эксцентрик 9×135 мм; Сквозная ось (универсальная); Сквозная ось 142×12 мм; Сквозная ось 148×12 мм (Boost); Сквозная ось 150×12 мм; Сквозная ось 157×12 мм (Super Boost); Другое
el: Βασικός πίσω άξονας: Βιδωτό 3/8 in (BMX); Κόντρα φρένο; Ταχείας απασφάλισης; Ταχείας απασφάλισης 9×135 mm; Περαστός άξονας (γενικής χρήσης); Περαστός άξονας 142×12 mm; Περαστός άξονας 148×12 mm (Boost); Περαστός άξονας 150×12 mm; Περαστός άξονας 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Άλλο
en: Rear axle standard: Bolt-on 3/8 in (BMX); Coaster brake; Quick release; Quick release 9×135 mm; Thru-axle (generic); Thru-axle 142×12 mm; Thru-axle 148×12 mm (Boost); Thru-axle 150×12 mm; Thru-axle 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Other
it: Assale posteriore standard: A bullone da 3/8 in (BMX); Freno a contropedale; Sgancio rapido; Sgancio rapido 9×135 mm; Perno passante (generico); Perno passante 142×12 mm; Perno passante 148×12 mm (Boost); Perno passante 150×12 mm; Perno passante 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Altro
bg-BG: Стандарт на задната ос: С болт 3/8 инча (BMX); Контра; Бързо освобождаване; Бързо освобождаване 9×135 mm; Проходна ос (стандартна); Проходна ос 142×12 mm; Проходна ос 148×12 mm (Boost); Проходна ос 150×12 mm; Проходна ос 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Други
nb: Bakaksel-standard: Fastskrudd 3/8 tommer (BMX); Navbrems; Hurtigkobling; Hurtigkobling 9×135 mm; Stikkaksel (generisk); Stikkaksel 142×12 mm; Stikkaksel 148×12 mm (Boost); Stikkaksel 150×12 mm; Stikkaksel 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Annet
fi: Taka-akselin standardi: Pultattava 3/8 tuumaa (BMX); Jalkajarru; Pikalinkku; Pikalinkku 9×135 mm; Läpiakseli (yleinen); Läpiakseli 142×12 mm; Läpiakseli 148×12 mm (Boost); Läpiakseli 150×12 mm; Läpiakseli 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Muu
nl: Achteras standaard: Boutbevestiging 3/8 inch (BMX); Terugtraprem; Snelspanner; Snelspanner 9×135 mm; Steekas (algemeen); Steekas 142×12 mm; Steekas 148×12 mm (Boost); Steekas 150×12 mm; Steekas 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Overig
ja: 後車軸規格: ボルトオン 3/8インチ (BMX); コースターブレーキ; クイックリリース; クイックリリース 9×135 mm; スルーアクスル (汎用); スルーアクスル 142×12 mm; スルーアクスル 148×12 mm (Boost); スルーアクスル 150×12 mm; スルーアクスル 157×12 mm (Super Boost); その他
lt-LT: Galinės ašies standartas: Prisukama 3/8 col. (BMX); Kojinis stabdys; Greitai atleidžiama; Greitai atleidžiama 9×135 mm; Perveriamoji ašis (bendrinė); Perveriamoji ašis 142×12 mm; Perveriamoji ašis 148×12 mm („Boost“); Perveriamoji ašis 150×12 mm; Perveriamoji ašis 157×12 mm („Super Boost“); Kitas
es: Estándar de eje trasero: Atornillado de 3/8 in (BMX); Freno contrapedal; Cierre rápido; Cierre rápido de 9×135 mm; Eje pasante (genérico); Eje pasante de 142×12 mm; Eje pasante de 148×12 mm (Boost); Eje pasante de 150×12 mm; Eje pasante de 157×12 mm (Super Boost); Otro